BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on government work delivered by Gyaincain Norbu, </F>
chairman of the Tibet Autonomous Regional People's Government, 
at the Second Session of the Sixth Tibet Autonomous Regional 
People's Congress on 15 May; place not known] 
  [Text] Fellow deputies: On behalf of the autonomous 
regional people's government, I now submit a report on the work 
of the government for your examination and approval, and also 
for suggestions and comments from members of the Chinese 
People's Political Consultative Conference [CPPCC] and other 
comrades. 
<H5>  I. Review of Work in 1993 </H5>
  Under the guidance of the guidelines of the 14th CPC 
National 
Congress and the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee, over the past year governments at all levels 
steadfastly implemented the party's basic line, made earnest 
efforts in implementing the guidelines of the Fourth Enlarged 
Plenary Session of the Fourth Tibetan Regional CPC Committee and 
the First Session of the Sixth Tibet Autonomous Regional 
People's Congress, adhered to the principle of "grasping two 
links" at the same time, made economic development our central 
task, and -- with the focus on the goal of establishing a 
socialist market economic structure -- deepened reform, opened 
up wider to the outside world, and promoted the development of 
productive forces. The gross regional product came to 3.65 
billion yuan, up 8.1 percent over the previous year in terms of 
comparable prices. Fresh progress was made on all fronts. 
  -- The economy in farming and pastoral areas developed 
steadily. Governments at all levels increased inputs in farming 
and stock breeding in terms of funds, materials, and technology, 
thus promoting economic development in farming and pastoral 
areas. The region's total agricultural output in 1993 topped 
2.32 billion yuan, up 5.3 percent over the previous year in 
terms of comparable prices. The region saw its sixth 
consecutive good year of agricultural production. The total 
grain output was 620,000 metric tons, up 3.3 percent over the 
previous year. In spite of natural disasters in some 
prefectures and counties, all the major stock-farming indexes 
rose slightly and remained stable compared to the previous year. 
Relatively rapid progress was made in the development of 
village and town enterprises and diversified undertakings. The 
total output value of village and town enterprises topped 100 
million yuan, an increase of 14.9 percent compared to the 
previous year. Income from diversified undertakings stood at 
240 million yuan, up 18.8 percent from the previous year. 
  -- The situation in industrial production was rather 
good. The region's total industrial output value reached 
535 million yuan, up 9.4 percent over the previous year in terms 
of comparable prices. The output of major manufactured goods 
improved markedly. The up-to-standard and good-quality rates of 
products improved, and the sales rates of industrial products 
reached 94.85 percent, bringing about, for the most part, the 
simultaneous growth of production, sales, and efficiency. 
  -- Smooth progress was made in infrastructure 
construction, with the focus on energy, transportation, and 
telecommunications projects. The region's investment in 
fixed assets in 1993 was 1.59 billion yuan, up 19.3 percent over 
the previous year. The Gonggar airport expansion project was 
completed and put into operation. The paving of the main runway 
at Bangda airport was basically completed. We have fulfilled 
our annual plans for renovating the Sichuan-Tibet, 
Qinghai-Tibet, China-Nepal, and Zetang-Honggar Highways. The 
Zhamu-Medog Highway has been preliminarily opened to traffic. 
The Yamzho Yumco and Chalong power stations overfulfilled their 
annual construction plans. Breakthrough progress was made in 
deep geothermal prospecting north of Yangabain. With the 
construction of telecommunications projects accelerating, urban 
telephone service in seven prefectures and cities has become 
automated. We have basically completed the earth-and-stone 
construction projects and the equipment installation for 61 
satellite communications ground receiving stations. The 
satellite communications ground receiving stations and automated 
telephone service have entered the stage of trial operations in 
seven prefectures and cities and 35 counties. Technical upgrade 
projects covered by the plan were completed rather well. 
  -- The region maintained a good momentum in growth in 
foreign trade and tourism. The autonomous region's total 
import-export trade volume was $103 million, up 60.9 percent 
over the previous year, of which exports were $15.03 million and 
imports were $87.60 million. Both figures showed marked 
increases over the previous year. As for tourism, we received 
23,000 tourists from Hong Kong, Macao, Taiwan, and foreign 
countries; the volume of business was 106 million yuan, up 14 
percent over the previous year, and the region earned $9 million 
in foreign exchange from tourism. 
  New progress was made in introducing investment from abroad 
and in establishing lateral ties at home. In 1993, the 
autonomous region officially approved 41 projects to introduce 
investment from abroad and to establish same-level ties at home, 
with contracts involving the use of external capital of 67.11 
million yuan and $9.63 million. In addition, the autonomous 
region set up, either on its own or in partnership, 129 
enterprises in coastal and other provinces and regions, which is 
a 370-percent increase over the previous year. 
  Customs, commodity inspection, hygienic inspection, animal 
quarantine, and border inspection departments offered active 
coordination and support in expanding opening up and developing 
foreign trade, economic cooperation, and tourism. 
  -- New progress was made in developing a market 
system. While improving the administration of industry and 
commerce, the region paid close attention to the planning and 
development of markets. The autonomous region built and rebuilt 
23 country markets. As a result of accelerated efforts in 
developing the market and improved market facilities, the market 
helped stimulate economic growth by guiding and promoting 
commodity circulation. The volume of retail commodity sales in 
Tibet was 1.9 billion yuan, up 12.8 percent over the previous 
year. Urban and rural markets were brisk, with flourishing 
buying and selling activities, and an initial success was 
achieved in cracking down on contraband and counterfeit goods. 
  -- Revenues increased by a comparatively large 
margin. Financial departments at all levels worked hard to 
push forward the development of production, and they made 
noticeable progress in expanding sources of revenue, 
strengthening financial departments at the county level, 
strictly enforcing the levying and management of taxes, and 
increasing revenues. In 1993, the region's local revenues 
totaled 156 million yuan, up 43.5 percent over the previous year. 
  --Living standards improved continuously. While 
directing all our efforts to develop the economy, we worked hard 
to improve the people's living standards. By stepping up 
efforts for renovating cities and towns and increasing the 
production of vegetables, meat, and butter, we met, by and 
large, the needs for daily necessities in both urban and rural 
areas. The per capita income of peasants and herdsmen was 521 
yuan, up 6.3 percent from 1992. Municipal facilities and living 
quarters in both urban and rural areas improved. New progress 
was made in social welfare services, such as giving special care 
to disabled servicemen and to families of servicemen and 
revolutionary martyrs. 
  -- New progress was made in education, science and 
technology, and other social undertakings. We made the 
development of education and science and technology a strategic 
priority by deepening reform and increasing input. A total of 
248 new schools of all types were set up in the region 
throughout the year. The school attendance rate of eligible 
school-age children reached 63.2 percent, up 2.7 percentage 
points from the previous year. Teaching conditions and quality 
were improved. Thanks to the energetic support of the State 
Education Commission and the provinces and municipalities 
concerned, notable results were achieved by schools that we set 
up in the hinterland which have a total enrollment of 11,000. 
In science and technology, we carried out basic research while 
attaching importance to the popularization of applied 
technology, which played an important role in revitalizing 
agriculture and promoting the technical transformation of 
enterprises. In social sciences, we carried out theoretical 
studies and academic exchanges in various fields, in focusing on 
ways to promote economic and social development, in safeguarding 
the motherland's unity, and in enhancing national unity. We saw 
a fairly rapid development in radio, cinema, and television 
projects and scored new results in literature and art, which 
have continually enriched the cultural life of the masses. We 
scored gratifying achievements in preserving our ethnic cultural 
heritage, and the work to repair the Potala Palace and other key 
relics proceeded smoothly. In public health, we made some 
headway in preventing and controlling diseases, in supervising 
hygiene, and in raising the standard of the people's health. 
Mass sports activities flourished, with the quality of 
mountaineering being continually improved. Fresh progress was 
also made in journalism and publications, meteorology, 
insurance, and other social undertakings. 
  -- We further strengthened work related to ethnic and 
religious affairs. We launched extensive education on the 
party's nationalities policy and on national unity, focusing on 
the implementation of the "Law on Regional National Autonomy" 
and the guidelines of the central conference on nationalities 
affairs. We further strengthened national unity, helped ethnic 
cadres grow to maturity, and continued to attach importance to 
studying, using, and developing ethnic languages. A ceremony 
was held to mark the completion and opening of the Great Stupa 
for Bainqen. In religious affairs, we concentrated on 
implementing the party's policy on religious freedom in an 
all-around manner, on strengthening the administration of 
religious affairs, and on formulating rules and regulations for 
managing temples and shrines. Meanwhile, we actively guided the 
large number of religious believers to help safeguard social 
stability and to promote economic development. 
  Under the party Central Committee and the State Council's 
kind concern and direct leadership and through the joint efforts 
of party and government organizations throughout the region, the 
party's policies were implemented in all fields. From 1980 to 
1993, a total of 220 million yuan were spent for the 
implementation of these policies, including nearly 100 million 
yuan for temples and shrines. The comprehensive implementation 
of the party's policies on the united front and on ethnic and 
religious affairs further enhanced the prestige of the party and 
the government among the masses and consolidated and developed 
political stability and unity. 
  -- We intensified the construction of democracy and the 
legal system and obtained fresh results in building spiritual 
civilization. The regional people's government 
conscientiously implemented resolutions of the regional people's 
congress and its Standing Committee, voluntarily accepted their 
supervision, and actively assisted the CPPCC regional committee 
in exercising its functions of political consultation and 
democratic supervision. The regional people's government 
earnestly handled motions of people's deputies, CPPCC regional 
committee members' suggestions, and visits and letters from the 
people; submitted six local laws and statutes to the regional 
people's congress for deliberation and approval; and formulated 
a number of administrative rules and regulations. We launched 
extensive education on popularizing legal knowledge to 
continuously enhance the awareness of laws among cadres and the 
people at large. We made headway in the campaigns to identify 
instances of "model counties (cities) in terms of double 
support," to promote spiritual civilization through the joint 
efforts of the Army, the Armed Police, and the masses, as well 
as in giving special care to disabled servicemen and to family 
members of revolutionary martyrs and servicemen, and in 
resettling demobilized soldiers. With a view to training a new 
generation of people who have lofty ideals, moral integrity, a 
good education, and a strong sense of discipline, we deepened 
and broadened education and focused on patriotism, socialism, 
and the Marxist outlook on ethnic and religious affairs. We 
scored fresh progress in building socialist spiritual 
civilization. 
  The Army and Armed Police units stationed in Tibet, while 
endeavoring to become modernized, regular, and revolutionary, 
actively assisted local people in economic construction and 
contributed to safeguarding the border, stabilizing the 
situation, supporting the government and cherishing the people, 
promoting spiritual civilization through joint Army-civilian 
efforts, and rescuing disaster victims and delivering disaster 
relief. 
  All in all, 1993 was a year in which the people of all 
nationalities in the region, guided by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
theory of building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
the party's basic line, seized the opportunity, deepened reform, 
opened up wider, and concentrated efforts on economic 
construction. The regional economy was further developed, the 
political situation became more stabilized, national unity was 
further strengthened, and advances were made in all fields of 
endeavor. The situation as a whole was good. The work in the 
past year can be summarized by the following distinctive 
characteristics: 
  Strengthening the sense of urgency regarding economic 
development, with mind emancipation as the forerunner. To turn 
the guidelines of the 14th National CPC Congress into conscious 
action by the masses and cadres, we made mind emancipation and 
changing concepts the prerequisite for deepening reform, opening 
wider to the outside world, and accelerating development; held 
discussions on mind emancipation and changing our way of 
thinking; and organized inspection delegations to learn from the 
hinterland. Through study tours, the cadres and masses enhanced 
their awareness of the importance of reform, opening to the 
outside world, and accelerating development after realizing that 
Tibet's economic development is lagging far behind other 
regions. After discovering Tibet's advantages and potential for 
developing the economy, the cadres and the masses became 
increasing enthusiastic about making plans, promoting 
development, building markets, and running enterprises. 
Throughout the autonomous region, 855 new state-owned and 
collective enterprises have been established with registered 
capital amounting to 830 million yuan, which is an increase of 
37.3 percent and 26.6 percent, respectively, over 1992. The 
nonpublic sector of the economy developed rapidly. The number 
of people employed by and the registered capital of individual 
industrial and commercial enterprises rose 73.8 percent and 71.6 
percent, respectively, over the previous year. Throughout the 
autonomous region, 46 private enterprises were established in 
1993 with registered capital of 7.31 million yuan, which is an 
increase of 330 percent and 120 percent over the previous year. 
  Intensifying the reform process while focusing on the 
objective of establishing a socialist market economic structure. 
In the reform of rural and pastoral areas, by further 
stabilizing and improving the policy in connection with "no 
changes in two aspects for a long time to come," developing 
social service systems, readjusting the production setup, and 
accelerating market construction in rural and pastoral areas, we 
promoted economic development in these areas. In enterprise 
reform, in focusing on transforming the operating mechanisms of 
enterprises, we ensured that enterprises enjoyed independent 
decision-making power, and we worked hard to improve 
enterprises' external environment for production and operations. 
As a result, their vitality was enhanced, and their economic 
performance rose. At the same time, we also conducted 
experiments in practicing the shareholding system in some 
enterprises and in forming enterprise groups. A big stride was 
made in pricing reform. We decontrolled the selling prices for 
timber. In accordance with the state's unified plan, we 
readjusted the prices of grain, edible oils, petroleum, and 
electricity. In a reform of the planning system, we delegated 
to lower-level organizations the power to examine and approve 
some capital construction investment and technical 
transformation projects. Enterprises were given greater power in 
making investments, while prefectures and counties were given 
greater control over financial and material resources, 
investment, and other areas. Besides, we have drawn up a 
preliminary program for reform of the financial, taxation, 
circulation, labor and employment, and housing systems, as well 
as reform of the social security system after carrying out 
investigations and conducting feasibility studies. 
  Improving and strengthening macroeconomic regulation and 
control to promote the healthy development of the economy. In 
accordance with the guidelines of Document No. 6 of the Central 
Committee, we achieved marked results in adopting measures for 
strengthening and improving macroeconomic regulation and control 
to deal with the problems facing reform and development. By 
rectifying the financial order, we succeeded in putting a stop 
to illegal interbank lending and indiscriminate fund-raising 
activities. As of the end of 1993, banking institutions 
throughout the region had recovered 310 million yuan of 
interbank loans made in violation of regulations, with a 
recovery rate exceeding 60 percent. Savings deposits by rural 
and urban residents rose by a big margin, and by the end of 
1993, such deposits amounted to 905 million yuan, an increase of 
29.46 percent over the previous year. More than 2.5 million 
yuan -- money collected from workers and staff members -- was 
returned to them. 
  Meanwhile, vigorous measures were taken 
to ensure a better cash flow to meet requirements of key 
projects. Following intensified tax collection and management, 
various tax revenues rose relatively fast, reaching 219 million 
yuan regionwide, a 34-percent increase over the previous year. 
The issue of fund-raising and fee collection in farming and 
pastoral areas was reviewed and checked, those documents and 
regulations that run counter to the interests of peasants and 
herdsmen were abrogated, and unwarranted fees were abolished. 
While strengthening audit supervision, the continued general 
inspection of accounting, taxation, and commodity prices 
produced marked results, resulting in the discovery of 
unaccountable-for sums amounting to 49.99 million yuan, of which 
13.42 million yuan have been deposited with the state treasury, 
as well as the abolition of over 80 items of unwarranted fees. 
Thanks to macroeconomic control and regulation, the economy 
developed in a healthy manner. 
  The social situation was further stabilized through 
adherence 
to the principle of "carrying out two tasks simultaneously with 
equal attention to both." In promoting reform, opening up, and 
economic development, we consistently took antisplittism and the 
stabilization of the situation as a major task, and we 
effectively carried out an antisplittist struggle in light of 
the new situation and new characteristics that had emerged in 
splittist activities. In particular, in light of changes in the 
international situation after last May, the Dalai Lama clique 
changed its techniques by attempting to exploit "hot" social 
topics to create new disturbances and troubles. Under this 
complicated situation, we resolutely cracked down on various 
splittist activities by strictly distinguishing between and 
correctly handling two types of contradictions which are 
different in nature, by doing well mass-related work, and by 
firmly trusting and relying on the masses. In giving full play 
to the superiority of combining specialized organs with the mass 
line, we enhanced the art of combating splittism, gained 
experience in launching an antisplittist struggle under the new 
situation, and achieved new victories in this respect. At the 
same time, we stepped up the comprehensive management of public 
security by severely clamping down on a number of serious 
criminals, including murderers, robbers, rapists, and thieves, 
and effectively maintained social order. 
  Efforts were made to deepen the anticorruption drive and to 
constantly improve the social atmosphere. A full-scale 
anticorruption drive was launched in accordance with the 
regional party committee's unified arrangements after the Second 
Enlarged Plenary Session of the Central Disciple Inspection 
Commission, from which we gained a better understanding of how 
party and government organs ran enterprises. The regionwide 
self-screening exercise by cadres at the county level and above 
was basically concluded by the end of the year. In fighting 
corruption, discipline inspection and supervisory organs at 
various levels heeded information given by the masses and 
conscientiously carried out investigations of 141 clues 
involving cadres at the county level and above. As of the end 
of 1993, seven people were given party and government 
disciplinary sanctions, one person was referred to judicial 
organs, and 192,400 yuan in economic losses were recouped. The 
initial success achieved in the anticorruption drive further 
enhanced the confidence of cadres and the masses. 
  The achievements we attained were the outcome of party 
committees and governments at all levels earnestly implementing 
the party's line, principles, and policies, as well as the 
outcome of the people of all nationalities throughout Tibet 
fighting in unity and advancing courageously to overcome 
difficulties. On behalf of the regional people's government, I 
pay sincere tribute to the vast numbers of cadres, workers, 
peasants and herdsmen, and intellectuals; to Army commanders and 
fighters, Armed Police officers and men, public security and 
state security cadres and police, and officials of the central 
departments stationed in Tibet; and to patriotic people of all 
nationalities in all circles. I also extend heartfelt gratitude 
to comrades from fraternal provinces and regions and friends 
from other countries who have concerned themselves with and 
support Tibet's economic development and are here to help the 
region's development and construction. 
  A comprehensive analysis and summation of our work shows 
that 
there are quite a few shortcomings and failings in our work, and 
that we face many difficulties and problems down the road. The 
most salient ones are: 1) Our minds are not sufficiently 
emancipated; our thoughts are outdated; we have failed to 
explore more ideas and measures for accelerating economic 
development; and we have not moved fast enough in reform and 
opening up. 2) Because Tibet has a fairly large number of 
inherent difficulties and problems -- such as backward energy, 
transportation, and communications facilities; poor natural 
conditions; a lack of talented personnel; and financial straits 
-- we face a formidable task in establishing a socialist market 
economic structure, and we need to adopt sound, coordinated 
reform measures. 3) Tibet's underdeveloped markets and 
inadequate market mechanisms and rules still lag far behind the 
needs of economic development. 4) Poor comprehensive 
agricultural productive capacity and weak rural economic 
strength have slowed the growth of peasants' and herdsmens' 
incomes. 5) The functions of government departments still 
cannot catch up with the demand for establishing a socialist 
market economy; while mental sluggishness, inertia, 
bureaucratism, formalism, subjectivism, and other unhealthy 
practices which alienate government departments from the masses 
are prevalent among some cadres, and a handful of cadres are 
engaged in corruption and dishonesty. 6) Due to the sabotage by 
hostile forces at home and abroad, factors for instability 
remain and have even escalated in certain aspects, thus 
seriously undermining reform, opening up, and economic 
construction. The aforesaid problems merit our keen attention 
and should be earnestly resolved. 
<H5>  II. Intensify Reform Efforts and Promote the Sustained, </H5>
Rapid, and Healthy Development of the Regional Economy 
  This year will be crucial for carrying out comprehensive and 
coordinated reform programs, achieving breakthroughs in key 
areas, and accelerating the establishment of a socialist market 
economy in Tibet. The guiding principles for the government's 
work are: taking as our guidance Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
of building socialism with Chinese characteristics and the 
party's basic line; comprehensively implementing the guidelines 
of the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee 
and of the Fifth Enlarged Plenary Session of the Fourth Tibet 
Regional CPC Committee; seizing the opportunity, deepening 
reform, opening up wider, promoting development, and maintaining 
stability; and continuing to improve macroeconomic regulation 
and control, to step up infrastructure construction, to 
energetically readjust the economic structure, and to improve 
economic efficiency, in order to promote the sustained, rapid, 
and healthy development of the regional economy. Economic 
development targets are set as follows: 4.01 billion yuan in 
gross regional product, or an increase of 8 percent from 1993 
when calculated in terms of comparable factors. This shall 
include 1.87 billion yuan, or a 4.3-percent increase, for 
primary industries; 600 million yuan, or a 10-percent increase, 
for secondary industries; and 1.54 billion yuan, or a 12-percent 
increase, for tertiary industries. 
  In accordance with the aforementioned guiding principles 
and tasks, we must ensure that all our work for this year is 
subordinate to and serves the overall task of reform, 
development, and stability, with reform playing a dominant role. 
In Tibet's reform of the economic structure, it is necessary to 
judge reform against the criterion of whether it will help 
develop productive forces, seize the opportune time, implement 
comprehensive and coordinated reform programs, and achieve 
breakthroughs in key areas. We should keep our framework and 
system consistent with those of the state. Based on Tibet's 
actual conditions, we must act firmly, carry out policies 
flexibly, and take each step steadily and properly. Governments 
at various levels should meticulously implement various reform 
measures already launched and work in a down-to-earth manner in 
all areas. 
  (1) Quicken the Economic Development of Agricultural 
and Pastoral Areas With the Primary Goal of Increasing Peasants' 
and Herdsmen's Incomes 
  The issues of agriculture, rural areas, and peasants are 
always fundamental issues that concern the party and country as 
a whole. They are also the foundations for economic development, 
social stability, and the country's self-reliance. We must 
further increase our understanding of agriculture and animal 
husbandry and of our work in farming and pastoral areas. We 
must earnestly implement the "Outline of China's Agricultural 
Development in the 1990's" and unswervingly give top priority to 
agriculture and animal husbandry in economic work. For some 
time to come, the guiding principle governing economic 
development in farming and pastoral areas is to deepen reform, 
rely on scientific and technological progress, increase 
investment, make better use of our resources, readjust the 
industrial structure, quicken the pace of eliminating poverty, 
and increase peasants' and herdsmen's incomes in keeping with 
the need to establish a socialist market economic structure. We 
should continue to stabilize and improve the policy that will 
remain unchanged for a long time to come. We should institute 
measures to ensure that land acreage will not change with the 
increase or decrease in the number of people working on it; 
implement a licensing system for grassland utilization; and 
clearly define grassland utilization rights. We should 
gradually institute the system of transferring, on a voluntary 
basis, the right to use land and grassland in return for 
payments without changing the ownership and designated uses of 
land and grassland. With the government's approval and under 
the guidance of unified planning, we should encourage peasants 
and herdsmen to develop uncultivated shoal land and hill slopes. 
We should implement a system whereby those responsible for 
opening up and operating wastelands will get the profit. We 
should improve the grain contract purchase system and set 
minimum prices for local grain purchases to protect peasants' 
interests. 
  We should increase inputs in agriculture and animal 
husbandry. We should broaden the channels of investment in 
agriculture and animal husbandry by increasing the proportion of 
fixed asset investment, fiscal inputs, and credit inputs, and 
encourage collectives and individuals to increase inputs. This 
year, Tibet's budget for aiding production in the rural areas 
will increase over that of last year by 13.7 percent, while 
fixed asset investment in local budgets will grow by 33.3 
percent. Furthermore, the region has invested 120 million yuan 
in the comprehensive agricultural development project for the 
"Yarlung Zangbo, Lhasa, and Nyang Qu River Valleys." We should 
properly manage the investment in agriculture and animal 
husbandry and establish an effective macroeconomic regulation 
and control mechanism. For diversified investments in 
agriculture and animal husbandry, we should raise investment 
returns through overall planning and coordination so that the 
production forces of the two sectors will be combined. To help 
Tibet's poor peasants and herdsmen, we should exploit the 
relatively rich labor resources in farming and pastoral areas to 
further improve the labor investment system and strengthen 
infrastructure construction for agriculture and animal 
husbandry. We should prepare well ahead for agricultural and 
animal husbandry projects, actively institute the project 
responsibility system and the objective-based management 
responsibility system, and vigorously improve production 
conditions to lay a good foundation for the steady development 
of agriculture and animal husbandry. 
  We should restructure according to market demand. We 
should strive to develop the agricultural sector into a highly 
efficient sector which produces greater and better yields by 
cultivating new grain strains, improving their quality, and 
raising efficiency. While ensuring a steady increase in grain 
output, we should restructure the planting sector. In 
restructuring the planting sector, we should focus on the 
Yarlung Zangbo, Nyang Qu, Lhasa, and Nyang River valleys and 
gradually shift to a three-crop structure composed of grain, 
cash, and forage crops. While continually strengthening animal 
husbandry on grasslands and changing the proportions of various 
animals, we should also vigorously develop animal husbandry in 
farming areas, promote local grain processing, and accelerate 
the construction of bases that expeditiously fatten cattle and 
sheep. We should thoroughly and extensively develop 
comprehensive agricultural development projects. While 
developing these projects, we should also pay attention to 
helping the poor, to improving small river valleys, and to 
carrying out afforestation activities. Furthermore, we should 
comprehensively improve hills, rivers, farmland, forests, and 
roads so as to raise the overall productivity and efficiency of 
agriculture and animal husbandry. Additionally, we should make 
great efforts to develop village and town enterprises and 
diversified operations. When developing village and town 
enterprises, we should proceed from the actual conditions of 
various localities and formulate rational programs and 
comprehensive plans. We should concentrate them in cities and 
towns where the supply of energy resources is assured, where 
transportation is convenient, and where economic activities are 
relatively brisk. In accordance with market demand in Tibet and 
elsewhere, and after taking into account local advantages in 
terms of resources, we should develop whatever we can and 
organize production and management in whichever way is conducive 
to development. Where conditions permit, certain localities may 
develop some joint enterprises that operate across township and 
county lines, and should expand their production and operational 
scale and upgrade their products. Relevant departments should 
lend their full support to the development of village and town 
enterprises by supplying them with funds, technology, personnel, 
and information, and should properly guide and serve them. 
Various localities should pay close attention to diversified 
operations, which are an effective way to raise the income of 
peasants and herdsmen, are compatible with the current level of 
productive forces in Tibet's farming and pastoral areas, and can 
benefit thousands of households. We should mobilize and 
organize the broad masses of peasants and herdsmen to make great 
efforts to develop diversified operations so as to strengthen 
the agricultural and stockbreeding sectors' own ability to 
accumulate wealth and lay the foundation for even greater 
economic development in farming and pastoral areas. 
  We should implement policies to protect the agricultural 
sector and animal husbandry. Starting with the marketing of 
this year's newly harvested grain, we should raise the 
procurement prices for wheat and rapeseed. After fertilizer 
prices have been readjusted, we should provide peasants with 
funds -- derived from a reduction in subsidies to offset 
policy-induced losses in enterprises engaged in the production 
of agricultural means of production -- as outright subsidies so 
as to protect their enthusiasm for growing grain. The whole of 
Tibet, including all prefectures (cities) and counties, should 
actively gather money to establish funds against production 
risks for agriculture and animal husbandry. We should ensure 
the sustained development of agriculture and animal husbandry. 
We should also continue to take effective measures to earnestly 
and properly reduce the burdens of peasants and herdsmen. 
  We should realistically and properly help and support the 
poor. At present, some people in Tibet still have difficulty 
clothing and feeding themselves. We still face very arduous 
tasks in helping and supporting the poor. We must concentrate 
on properly tackling the arduous tasks in helping the poor in 
accordance with the State Council's "plan of helping 80 million 
poor households in China to shake off poverty by the year 2000." 
Tibet has formed a leading group specially in charge of tasks 
in helping the poor. We should formulate programs to help the 
poor across Tibet and should establish a help-the-poor 
responsibility system, as well as a system whereby leading 
cadres are responsible for helping specific poverty-ridden 
areas. Relevant departments should actively coordinate among 
themselves, provide support to key areas, and help poor people 
shake off poverty within stipulated periods. We should 
transform our help-the-poor program from one based on simple 
relief to meet everyday needs to one based on development, 
scientific and technological progress, and knowledge. We should 
take measures which are normally taken in construction projects, 
and launch a number of help-the-poor projects which can be 
completed shortly and can yield high returns so as to explore 
ways to help the poor shake off poverty and become rich. 
  We need to stress: Governments at various levels should have 
a firm conviction in combating calamities and in reaping bumper 
harvests. We should be fully prepared to combat major 
calamities and should strive to ensure bumper harvests in 
agriculture and animal husbandry in 1994. This is an important 
and realistic issue for developing agriculture and animal 
husbandry and for raising the income of peasants and herdsmen. 
We must attach great importance to this issue. 
  (2) Intensify Infrastructure Construction and 
Improve the Ability To Sustain Regional Economic Development 
  Energy, transportation, communications, and other 
infrastructure facilities are the material foundations on which 
to promote economic development, as well as the prerequisites 
for improving Tibet's investment environment and increasing its 
ties and economic contacts with foreign countries and other 
provinces and regions. We must endeavor to markedly improve 
Tibet's infrastructure within a relatively short period of time. 
  In stepping up infrastructure construction, we must deepen 
the reform of fixed asset investment, further arouse the 
enthusiasm of various investors, and gradually set up a system 
under which investment sources are diversified, investment 
decisions are made at different levels, and funds are secured 
through various channels. Based on how fixed asset investment is 
used in society, on the investment scope of various investment 
sources, and on the economic and social benefits and market 
demands of different projects, investment will generally be made 
in competitive, infrastructure, and public welfare construction 
projects. Financing and investment activities for competitive 
projects will be gradually shifted toward the market, with 
enterprises raising funds and building and operating the 
projects in the market, while investment in infrastructure and 
public welfare construction projects will be made mainly by the 
state and the autonomous region. Regional budgetary 
appropriations will be arranged and managed by planning 
departments, and used primarily for the construction of 
agricultural, transportation, energy, postal, 
telecommunications, and other infrastructure facilities, as well 
as for education, science, technology, urban construction, and 
other public welfare services. We will gradually establish an 
investment risk-control mechanism, actively implement the 
responsibility system for enterprise legal entities, standardize 
financing and investment activities for construction projects, 
and establish a stringent responsibility system for investment 
policy decisions. We shall strengthen macroeconomic regulation 
and control over investment scale, continuing to make mandatory 
plans for the total volume of budgetary and loan investment, 
guidance plans for other investment by state-owned units, and 
forecasting plans for investment by collective, private, and 
individual economic sectors. We shall reform the system of 
managing capital construction, organize and set up regional 
project consulting companies, gradually liberalize design and 
construction markets, and comprehensively implement the public 
bidding system. 
  In intensifying infrastructure construction, we must pay 
close attention to key projects and ensure their quality. This 
year, the regional budgetary investment in fixed assets will be 
50 million yuan more than that of 1993. This is the maximum 
amount that we can afford to make in view of Tibet's financial 
straits. All localities and departments must comply with the 
State Council's circular on continuing to strengthen 
macroeconomic regulation and control over fixed asset 
investment, earnestly strengthen investment management, improve 
investment returns, and strictly review and approve construction 
projects. In accordance with the regional industrial policy and 
with the principle of ensuring key projects, we shall take into 
full account the comprehensive benefit and give priority to key 
projects already under construction, as well as to agriculture, 
animal husbandry, energy, transportation, telecommunications, 
and other infrastructure facilities. We shall continue to 
expedite the construction of projects already under construction 
and their management after completion. Particular attention 
shall be paid to ensuring adherence to the construction schedule 
for and the quality of the Yamzho Yumco and Chalong power 
stations; the revamping of the Qinghai-Tibet, Sichuan-Tibet, and 
China-Nepal highways; the repair of Bangda airport; and the 
comprehensive agricultural development project for the Yarlung 
Zangbo, Lhasa, and Nyang Qu river valleys. 
  (3) Effectively Tackle Industrial Production by 
Centering on Upgrading Efficiency 
  State enterprises are part of the backbone of Tibet's 
modernization as well as the central link in the region's reform 
of its economic structure. In accordance with the demand to 
change the operating mechanism of state enterprises and 
establish a modern enterprise system, we must actively and 
comprehensively promote reform to raise economic efficiency of 
enterprises. 
  We should further deepen enterprise reform and continue to 
implement the "Regulations on Changing the Operating Mechanisms 
of State-Owned Industrial Enterprises," as well as the Tibet 
regional autonomy's measures for implementing the regulations, 
so as to fully grant various rights to enterprises. We should 
guide enterprises in concentrating their efforts on changing 
their operating mechanisms and raising efficiency. We should 
comprehensively promote the linkage of renumeration and 
efficiency as well as deepen reform of three systems. We 
should, in accordance with the "Company Law," actively explore 
an efficient way to establish a modern enterprise system, 
further clarify property rights relations, and strengthen the 
supervision and control of state assets. We should encourage 
enterprises to optimize their organizational structures through 
merger, separation, a shift to other product lines, takeover, 
and the establishment of enterprise groups. Poorly managed and 
inefficient state enterprises should be reorganized, leased, or 
auctioned off according to different situations. Bankruptcy 
experiments should be carried out carefully and properly in 
accordance with the law for state enterprises that have long 
incurred losses, have no hope of eliminating losses, and are 
unable to repay debts with their capital. As enterprises change 
their operating mechanisms and raise their economic efficiency, 
governments at all levels should change their own functions, 
better serve enterprises, and adopt more effective measures to 
lessen enterprises' burdens and enhance their vitality. 
  We should seize the opportune time for reform to upgrade 
enterprise production capacity and economic efficiency. 
Enterprises of various categories must strive to change their 
business strategies by gearing their operations toward the 
market and adopting effective production and sales measures. In 
accordance with the demand of the market economy, enterprises 
should strengthen their management and further improve their 
internal responsibility systems. They should enhance 
on-the-spot supervision as well as impose strict industrial, 
labor, and financial discipline. In addition, enterprises 
should establish and perfect their various rules and regulations 
and standards for production quotas; strengthen quality control; 
ensure steady upgrading of product quality; and bring about 
simultaneous growth in production, sales, and efficiency. We 
must conscientiously turn enterprise losses into profits, and, 
starting with state enterprises that suffer from heavy losses, 
we should make great efforts to reduce the proportion of 
loss-making enterprises and cut their losses. We should 
earnestly implement effective technological transformation 
measures through restructuring, upgrading product quality, and 
reducing energy and raw materials consumption to enhance 
enterprise production capacity and competitiveness. 
  We should quicken the development and utilization of 
resources, and convert abundant resources into economic gain. 
We should continue to develop livestock, forestry, and mineral 
products by increasing product varieties, enlarging production 
scale, and vigorously creating added value during the course of 
processing. This year, we should do a good job in preliminary 
work for gold mining and begin work early. We should exploit 
Tibet's unique material resources to actively develop new and 
superior economic sectors producing such goods as health care 
products and tourist souvenirs with uniquely highland 
characteristics. In accordance with the demand of the growing 
capital construction market, we should actively develop the 
building materials industry. Following the improvement in 
Tibet's energy supply, we should formulate early development 
plans for the processing industry and gradually implement them 
to strengthen secondary industry and make it a new growth area 
which can quicken Tibet's economic development. 
  (4) Open Wider to the Outside World; Vigorously 
Develop Foreign Trade and Tourism 
  Foreign economic exchanges and trade enjoy a unique, 
superior 
position in Tibet, as do tourism. Hence, they should contribute 
more to economic development. We must seize the opportunity to 
deepen reform, gradually establish operating and competitive 
mechanisms that are compatible with common international 
economic and market rules, and continue to open wider to the 
outside world in an in-depth manner. 
  We should deepen reform of the foreign economic and trade 
system; establish a foreign trade operating mechanism capable of 
meeting the requirements of a market economy; and uphold the 
reform orientation that emphasizes unified policies, liberalized 
operations, fair competition, responsibility for one's own 
profits and losses, the integration of industry and trade, and 
the promotion of the agency system. The highlights of reform 
are: 1) To move in step with the rest of the country in 
unifying the foreign exchange rates; abolish the mandatory plan 
governing receipt and expenditure of foreign exchange in export 
trade and the retention and delivery of foreign exchange 
receipts to the state; and to adopt a system of settling foreign 
exchange through banks; 2) to formulate and improve preferential 
policy designed to encourage exports; 3) to accelerate the 
transformation of the operating mechanisms of various categories 
of foreign trading enterprises by turning them from executors of 
state plans to dealers in import and export commodities, and 
introduce a system under which enterprises will link wages and 
bonuses to foreign exchange earnings generated by exports and to 
economic efficiency; 4) to empower qualified production and 
commodity distribution enterprises to conduct foreign trade with 
a view to establishing, as soon as possible, a number of foreign 
trading companies along the lines of general merchandise stores; 
5) to strengthen and perfect macroeconomic regulation and 
control over foreign trade to ensure a sound foreign trading 
order. The quota system applied to a small number of export and 
import commodities -- whose total amount is subject to state 
control -- should be continued. Quotas should be allotted 
through open bidding, auction, or standard procedures, they 
should take into account the efficiency of an enterprise, and 
operate in accordance with the principle of fairness and equity. 
  We should vigorously develop foreign economic exchanges and 
trade. We must, as required by reform of the foreign trade 
system, start with small-scale foreign trade and aim for 
large-scale foreign economic exchanges and trade; enlist all of 
society in foreign economic exchanges and trade; and use trade 
to promote opening up, which, in turn, will spur development. 
We should make great efforts to expand exports in a bid to 
stimulate the development of other industries. We should 
diversify our markets, take the initiative in entering the 
market, and seek development through fair competition. We should 
correctly apply the series of preferential policies offered by 
the central government, enhance our legal consciousness, 
strengthen management, and maintain Tibet's reputation in 
foreign trade. Currently, we should stress the following tasks: 
Using Tibet's resources to actively produce, for export, such 
key products as local and special farm and livestock products, 
ethnic handicrafts, and tourist souvenirs; taking advantage of 
our border location to improve existing trading posts and to 
simultaneously expand trade and develop cooperation in various 
fields with neighboring countries; appropriately linking 
production, processing, and export to promote the integration of 
trade, industry, agriculture, and technology; further 
strengthening economic and technical cooperation and lateral 
economic ties, and taking advantage of preferential policies to 
improve the investment environment and attract more investors 
from abroad and other parts of the country; exploring a variety 
of new ways to channel foreign funds; continuing to forge 
interregional cooperation with inland enterprises in various 
fields, establishing enterprise associations with them for the 
provision of mutual support and the exchange of materials and 
goods, and establishing joint production bases for the export of 
products in an effort to expand exchange-generating exports. 
  We will continue to vigorously develop tourism. We will 
concentrate on quality and efficiency and stress the development 
of tourist markets, resources, and commodities to open up new 
tour routes and tourist areas; gradually form a pattern 
combining individual tourist spots, tour routes, and tourist 
areas; and actively develop specialist tours such as 
mountaineering, expeditions, and scientific investigations. It 
is necessary to strengthen the development of new tourist spots 
and routes, strengthen management and quality awareness in the 
industry, upgrade the caliber of tourism personnel, and improve 
our overall ability to receive tourists. Efforts should be made 
to intensify propaganda and promotional activities, attract a 
wide range of tourists, and steadily develop group tours. We 
will strive for new breakthroughs in tourism in terms of the 
number of tourists, business income, and foreign exchange 
earnings. It is essential to strengthen tourism administration, 
contribute to social stability in carrying out tourism-related 
work, and resolutely put an end to the acts of some tour guides 
in colluding with foreign tourists to harm state security. 
  We will attach importance to and strengthen foreign-related 
work. While actively accommodating overall state diplomacy and 
focusing on the central tasks of the regional party committee 
and the government, we will conscientiously do a good job in 
frontier administration, consular and foreign-related work, 
protocol and reception, and the establishment of inter-city 
friendly relations and friendly associations, so as to try to 
create a good environment, continually expand foreign contacts, 
and promote the region's reform, opening up to the outside 
world, and economic construction. 
  (5) Continue To Properly Carry Out Financial, 
Taxation, and Monetary Work To Guarantee Funding for Economic 
and Social Development 
  Good financial and taxation work is an important guarantee 
of 
deepening reform and economic construction and social 
development. It is essential to conscientiously take good charge 
of financial and taxation reform, which is a major task in 
reform of the economic structure, and gradually adapt it to the 
needs of a socialist market economy. We should fully inspire 
the initiative of governments at various levels in increasing 
revenue, cutting expenditure, and developing the economy to 
continually strengthen local economies. 
  We will actively pursue reform of the financial and tax 
systems. 1) We will unify and lower domestically funded 
enterprise income tax and abolish the regulatory tax, bonus tax, 
and energy and communications fund contributions levied on 
state-owned enterprises. 2) We will enforce the new personal 
income tax. 3) We will impose turnover taxes, of which 
value-added tax constitutes the main component. 4) We will 
expand the levying scope of some taxes as well as abolish and 
introduce some other kinds of tax. In accordance with the needs 
of the state's new financial system, the autonomous region will 
implement in its prefectures and cities the financial and tax 
system of "dividing tax items, appraising revenue and 
expenditure, granting fixed amounts of subsidies, and 
implementing a contractual responsibility system at each level." 
It is necessary, as soon as possible, to draw up a realistic, 
rational program for specifically implementing tax system reform 
and determining the relationship, in terms of revenue 
distribution, between the autonomous region and the prefectures 
and cities and between the prefectures and cities and various 
counties, so as to truly implement financial and tax reform. At 
the same time, it is essential to reform administrative 
procedures for financial budgeting and work out a compound 
budget at the autonomous regional level. It is necessary to 
beef up organizations that administer state assets and 
strengthen such administration. We will earnestly carry out the 
appraisal of fixed assets and circulating funds in state-owned 
enterprises in accordance with the national unified arrangements. 
  We will earnestly and properly carry out financial and 
taxation work. Finance and tax departments at all levels should 
cope with the needs of the new system to give full play to the 
different functions and roles of budgeting, taxation, financing, 
and other means of regulation and control, and flexibly apply 
these means, to the extent required, in the light of changes in 
economic development in order to promote healthy economic 
development. It is necessary to vigorously organize revenue 
collection, strictly enforce tax laws and exercise tax 
authority, strengthen tax collection and administration, collect 
and deposit in the regional treasury the full amount of tax 
payment due, and block tax defaults and evasion. Continued 
efforts should be made to improve county-level finances. We 
should begin by developing production and foster inexhaustible 
financial sources to gradually upgrade the level of financial 
self-sufficiency in various counties. We must strengthen 
auditing and give play to its supervisory function in upholding 
the solemnity of financial budgeting. We should adhere to the 
policy of austerity and tightly control institutional 
consumption to guarantee adequate funds for key projects, for 
the payment of workers' wages, and for the implementation of 
various reform policies. 

    The banking service should continue to adhere to the purpose 
of supporting Tibet's reform, opening up, and economic 
development; rectify banking order; and play the important role 
of macroeconomic regulation and control of optimizing resource 
distribution. It is necessary to improve credit management and 
optimize credit structure according to market economic demand. 
A high priority should be given to the loans which are extended 
to support the development of agriculture, animal husbandry, and 
village and town enterprises, and easier terms should be set for 
borrowers to obtain such loans. The banking service should 
support the construction of energy sources, transport, 
telecommunications and other basic industry and key projects. 
It should support enterprises in changing operational 
mechanisms and taking part in market competition. 
  (6) Accelerate the Construction of Markets and 
Cultivate a Unified and Open Market System 
  While continuing to improve and develop the commodity 
market, 
we should accelerate the cultivation of the production-factors 
market, step up the formulation of market rules, maintain market 
order, and create a united, open, competitive, and orderly 
market system as soon as possible. 
  We should continue to deepen the reform of the commodity 
circulation system, encourage and support various economic 
sectors in participating in Tibet's commodity circulation, and 
create an operational mechanism for the smooth circulation of 
massive quantities of commodities through large markets 
characterized by a close relationship among producers, 
suppliers, and sellers. We should establish, step by step, a 
modern commodity circulation enterprise system; and develop such 
commodity circulation enterprises as enterprise groups, chain 
stores, and department stores. We should promote the 
integration of domestic trade and foreign trade, and conduct 
experiments in letting some commodity circulation enterprises 
engage in import-export trade. We should attract foreign 
investors, import advanced managerial expertise, and run 
Chinese-foreign retail joint ventures on a trial basis. We 
should set up an autonomous regional supply and marketing 
cooperative, organize county supply and marketing federations 
after experiments prove them feasible, and turn supply and 
marketing cooperatives into comprehensive economic organizations 
which serve the farming and pastoral areas and perform the 
functions of producer, supplier and seller. State-owned 
commercial enterprises should engage mainly in wholesale 
business and should take an active part in building the 
wholesale market. In principle, small state-owned commercial 
enterprises may be operated by private individuals under state 
ownership, or leased or auctioned off to private individuals. 
It is necessary to deepen reform of the grain circulation 
system and the reform of accounting system of petroleum 
enterprises. 
  We should actively and prudently promote the reform of the 
pricing system in accordance with the unified arrangements of 
the state, and seriously implement the autonomous region's 
commodity price reform policy. In the meantime, we should step 
up macro-economic regulation and control of prices, as well as 
the work of monitoring and tracking commodity prices. Whenever 
a problem is discovered, it should be solved promptly through 
coordination. A small number of important goods and materials 
are marketed mainly by state-owned commercial enterprises; the 
expenses in connection with their wholesale should be properly 
managed; and both minimum protective prices and ceiling prices 
should be set for them. Greater efforts should be made to 
monitor the prices of daily necessities and services for 
residents, and to ensure that the prices of commodities and 
services are clearly marked to protect the interests of both 
producers and consumers. Effective measures should be taken to 
establish a risk regulatory fund and an important materials 
reserve system. It is necessary to keep in reserve a proper 
quantity of certain important materials which have a bearing on 
the national economy and the people's livelihood, so as to 
ensure supply and stabilize the prices and the market. 
  We should gradually establish and improve the markets of 
various categories. At present, efforts should be made to build 
primary country markets in various counties and towns at which 
peasants and herdsmen will do business. It is necessary to 
build a production-factors markets, develop a money market with 
capital mainly provided by banks, and establish standard 
securities management and issuance organs. It is necessary to 
set up a manpower exchange center, open up the labor market, 
promote personnel exchanges between Tibet and fraternal 
provinces and regions, actively attract qualified personnel from 
the outside to work in Tibet, and gradually create a market 
mechanism for the development, utilization, and rational 
distribution of manpower. It is necessary to build an 
information transmission and feedback network which suits 
Tibet's reform, opening up, and economic development. 
  Great efforts should be made to develop individual and 
private sector of economy. The autonomous region's "Certain 
Provisions on Accelerating the Development of the Individual and 
Private Sector of the Economy" contain a series of preferential 
policies. No restriction whatsoever has been imposed on the 
proportion of the individual and private sector that can be 
developed in relation to other sectors. As for the speed of 
development, so long as the individual and private sector 
conforms to our industrial policy, produces marketable goods, 
and shows good economic efficiency, it can develop as fast as 
possible. In operating scale, we support this sector in 
creating large associations and running large enterprises. All 
business areas are open to the individual and private sector, 
except those areas prohibited by the state. The individual and 
private sector may operate in a flexible and varied way without 
being subject to restrictions, and it is permitted to operate 
state-owned enterprises under contract or lease, or to buy out 
state-owned enterprises. We support qualified private 
enterprises and individual economic entities using foreign 
capital to run joint ventures and cooperative enterprises. It 
is necessary to handle correctly the relationship between the 
government's macroeconomic regulation and control and the market 
forces because both are essential under the socialist market 
economic structure. On the one hand, we should actively 
cultivate and develop the market system, continue to promote the 
reforms of the pricing system and the commodity circulation 
system, and make the market play the basic role in resource 
distribution. On the other hand, we should seriously improve and 
strengthen the regulation, control, management and supervision 
of the market, continue to combat "fake goods and smuggling," 
and prevent and overcome economic disorder. 
  (7) Great Efforts Should Be Made To Develop Education, 
Science, and Technology, and To Improve Worker Quality 
  The establishment of a socialist market economic structure 
and the realization of modernization are ultimately determined 
by improving the quality of people, the training of qualified 
personnel, and scientific and technological progress. For this 
reason, we must always make development of education, science, 
and technology a strategic priority, and rely on scientific and 
technological progress to revitalize Tibet. 
  Great efforts should be made to develop education. We should 
seriously implement the "Decision of the Tibet Autonomous 
Regional Party Committee and People's Government on the Reform 
and Development of Tibet's Education," and make great efforts to 
develop education in the region while striving to attain the 
objectives proposed in the "Decision" that each county should 
have at least one middle school, each township should have at 
least one well-developed elementary school, and 80 percent of 
school-age children should be admitted to school by the end of 
the century, while at the same time striving to meet the 
manpower needs of a socialist market economy. In order to do so, 
we should first deepen reform of the education system in 
accordance with the state's general guidelines and unified plan 
for educational reform and in consideration of Tibet's 
realities. We should readjust the educational structure and 
academic disciplines to meet the needs of establishing a 
socialist market economic structure. Second, we should 
seriously carry out the "Procedures of the Tibet Autonomous 
Region for Implementation of the `Compulsory Education Law of 
the People's Republic of China'"; conscientiously strengthen 
basic education; arouse enthusiasm in all sectors of society; 
develop various forms of vocational, technical, adult, and 
social education at various levels; and accelerate the training 
of junior and intermediate-level technicians to meet the urgent 
need for economic development. We should give high priority to 
the development of teachers' education and train reserve 
teachers with both moral integrity and ability. Third, we 
should attach importance to investment in education. While 
schools are mainly run by the government, we should encourage 
the public to run schools by pooling resources, so as to 
accelerate the development of education. Fourth, we should 
seriously implement the "Teachers Law," build up the contingent 
of teachers, do a good job in teacher training, improve the 
teachers' performance appraisal system, improve teachers' 
political quality and professional quality, and adopt effective 
measures to stabilize the current contingent of teachers. Fifth, 
we should earnestly improve education administration and raise 
the efficiency of school administration and educational quality. 
While attaching importance to teaching basic theories and 
knowledge, we should pay attention to cultivating practical 
skills. Schools of all categories at various levels should 
firmly put the correct political orientation above all else, and 
strive to train qualified personnel who have lofty ideals, moral 
integrity, a good education, and a strong sense of discipline. 
  We should firmly foster the viewpoint that science and 
technology are a primary productive force and that economic 
development should rely on scientific and technological 
advances, and further strengthen scientific and technological 
research and development so as to solve crucial technological 
problems in industrial and agricultural production. We shall 
continue to do a good job in popularizing applied technology. 
Scientific research units should conduct technological 
transfers, technological development, technological 
consultation, and technological services, along with the effort 
to promote the autonomous region's technological advances and 
the popularization of agricultural and animal husbandry science 
and technology, and gradually shift to market-based and 
enterprise-type operations. On the basis of attaching 
importance to research and development, we shall accelerate 
transforming scientific and technological findings into 
productive forces in order to gradually guide Tibet's economic 
development onto the track of relying on scientific and 
technological advances. While concentrating on academic 
activities, science and technology associations and societies 
should attach importance to the popularization of science so as 
to create a good social atmosphere in which knowledge and 
talented people are respected and science is widely studied and 
applied. 
  We must effectively do a good job in training personnel. 
This is crucial to the smooth development of undertakings in 
our region. We must attach a high degree of importance to the 
work of training personnel and carry it out in earnest. We 
should adopt practical and feasible measures to stabilize the 
existing contingents of trained personnel. Efforts should be 
made to improve their working and living conditions so as to 
enhance their enthusiasm and give play to their wisdom and 
intelligence. We should encourage and urge trained personnel of 
various types to work at grassroots units and the frontline of 
production so that they can use their talent there. Meanwhile, 
we should accelerate the renewal of knowledge by strengthening 
the work of training existing personnel on the job and sending 
them for further studies in other areas, so as to meet the needs 
of economic and social development. We should actively bring in 
trained personnel of all types badly needed in our region. We 
should do this by implementing preferential policies and by 
combining the organized transfer of personnel with the free 
introduction of personnel, by combining permanent personnel with 
floating personnel, and by combining long-term stay with 
short-term stay, so as to gradually expand the contingents of 
trained personnel. 
  (8) Improve the Social Security System and Accelerate 
the Pace of Reform in the Urban Housing System 
  We shall accelerate reform of the social insurance system 
which consists mainly of old-age pension and unemployment 
insurance. We shall expand the scope of overall planning of 
old-age pension insurance and raise the proportion of overall 
planning by including in the overall plan the workers and staff 
of state-owned enterprises and the workers of state organs, mass 
organizations, and institutions owned by the whole people. 
Money to be collected from funds under the overall plan shall 
be increased from 20 percent to 25 percent; old-age insurance 
funds shall be arranged under overall plans at the autonomous 
regional level in order to strengthen the regulatory function. 
Efforts should be made to improve social security work in 
farming and pastoral areas by continuing to conduct experiments 
in old-age pension insurance and insurance against disasters in 
agriculture and animal husbandry. Meanwhile, we shall 
conscientiously do a good job in employment work by enhancing 
the enthusiasm of all sectors of the economy and society toward 
solving the question of employment and raising society's ability 
to create more jobs. Collective and individual economic 
entities whose main mission is to provide jobs for unemployed 
people will be given preferential treatment in these aspects -- 
scope of operation, credit, taxation -- to enable them to employ 
more people and lighten the burden of the masses and the 
pressure on society. 
  It is necessary to quicken the pace of urban housing 
system reform and establish a new housing system that 
corresponds to the socialist market economic system. The major 
tasks for housing reform are: raising public housing rents; 
providing appropriate subsidies to workers who have a job or 
have retired; comprehensively promoting the housing accumulation 
fund system; actively carrying out experiments in public housing 
sales by implementing preferential home purchase policies for 
workers within a specified period to encourage them to purchase 
houses; and proposing the gradual use of housing funds by 
government and work units exclusively for constructing and 
repairing urban housing. We should quicken housing construction 
to alleviate housing shortages and improve living conditions; 
gradually commercialize housing on a society-wide basis; and 
strive for notable improvement in housing conditions for Tibet 
residents within a fairly short period. 
  In urban construction, we should follow the principles of 
developing production, promoting economic prosperity, and 
improving living conditions; develop sound plans and execute 
them in stages with a view to developing central markets in 
which economic activities are carried out. We should strengthen 
overall urban management and constantly improve and give full 
rein to urban functions. We should carry out housing 
construction in counties and towns in a step-by-step manner. 
  In environmental protection, it is necessary to strictly 
enforce the "Environmental Protection Law" to protect and 
improve the production and ecological environments, prevent 
various environmental pollutants, strengthen environmental and 
geological monitoring efforts, and implement bioengineering 
measures to minimize losses caused by various natural disasters. 
We should earnestly strengthen the protection of precious and 
rare wild animals and plants. In addition, we must ban wanton 
poaching, tree felling, and digging to safeguard the ecological 
balance and bring environmental protection into line with 
socioeconomic development. 
<H5>  III. Strive To Create a Good Social Environment To Ensure </H5>
Smooth Process in Reform and Development 
  Development is the foundation for social stability, and 
reform will inject strong vigor into development. It is 
possible to promote smooth progress in reform, opening up, and 
economic development only when social stability is maintained. 
We must correctly handle the relationships between reform, 
development, and stability so as to create favorable conditions 
and a good social environment for deepening reform and 
quickening development. 
  (1) We should earnestly study Volume 3 of the 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping while keeping in mind 
the overall task of reform, development, and stability. To 
ensure smooth progress in reform and development, we must arm 
the people in Tibet with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics. In particular, 
it is necessary to study well Volume 3 of the Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping. This is currently a major event in 
Tibet's political life. Cadres at various levels, particularly 
leading cadres at and above county-level, must set an example 
and take the lead in studying the book well. Through study, we 
should truly grasp the book's essence, deepen our understanding, 
and correctly understand the important theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics and the major policy 
decision on establishing a socialist market economic system. We 
should further emancipate our minds, renew our concepts, enhance 
the sense of responsibility and mission to quicken Tibet's 
development, and continue to upgrade our political, ideological, 
and leadership levels. We should strengthen our capability to 
master the reform process and work creatively. 
  (2) We should adhere to the principle of "grasping 
two links simultaneously" and further stabilize the situation, 
and must deepen the struggle against separatism. 
Separatism and opposition to separatism, being a serious 
political struggle, have a bearing on the fundamental interests 
of the people of all nationalities in the country, including the 
people of Tibet. In recent years, our region has achieved 
significant successes in the struggle against separatism, but 
the separatist forces inside and outside China have by no means 
abandoned their scheme for "Tibet independence." Under the new 
situation, the Dalai Lama clique and international hostile 
forces are strengthening their collusion, constantly readjusting 
their tactics, and changing methods in their intensified 
activities to split the motherland. They continue to send 
agents and spies into China to expand their underground 
reactionary organizations and to intensify political, 
ideological, and religious infiltration. They are extending the 
feelers of separatist activities to farming and pastoral areas 
and are using every means to compete with us in winning over the 
next generation. Exploiting "hot" topics in society, they 
incite the masses, sow dissension among various nationalities, 
and create incidents in an attempt to undermine political 
stability and unity, and to interfere with reform, opening to 
the outside world, and economic construction. Facts show that 
separatist activities are still the principal factor affecting 
our region's stability and that the struggle between the forces 
for separatism and those against it will be protracted, acute, 
and complicated. Under no circumstances should we take this 
lightly and lower our guard. We must unswervingly grasp the two 
important matters -- opposing separatism and stabilizing the 
situation. After decades of development and construction, our 
country is becoming increasingly stronger with each passing day, 
with its status rising swiftly in the international community. 
The conspiratorial activities of a handful of hostile forces 
and separatists are doomed to fail, because we are determined 
and able to smash all their sabotage activities. In the 
struggle against separatism, we must firmly believe in and rely 
on the masses, conduct propaganda among them, organize them to 
thoroughly expose the separatists' schemes, constantly heighten 
the masses' consciousness of waging a struggle against 
separatism, and vigorously commend advanced models who have 
struggled resolutely against the separatists and serious 
criminal elements. Meanwhile, we should continue to give play 
to the special role of patriotic people of all nationalities and 
all walks of life in the struggle against separatism and try to 
build the struggle against separatism on a solid and broad mass 
basis. We must strengthen the people's democratic dictatorship 
and continue to implement the principle of "having a clear-cut 
stand, giving tit for tat, and dealing resolute blows." In 
dealing with disturbances engineered by the separatist forces, 
we should have resolute policies; our command must be effective; 
we must deal telling blows, and never should we become 
tender-hearted. 
  To consistently adhere to the principle of "grasping two 
links simultaneously" and to further stabilize the situation, it 
is necessary to strengthen the comprehensive management of 
public security. In line with the principles of combining 
prevention and control with the participation of the masses, 
combining crackdown with prevention, tackling problems as well 
as the root cause of problems, and giving emphasis to tackling 
the root cause of problems, we should further implement the 
responsibility system under which "the person in charge will be 
held responsible." We should mobilize forces in society and 
give full play to the role of military-police-civilian joint 
defense, public security joint defense, public security 
protection, and militia organizations, so as to enable them to 
undertake joint responsibility for safeguarding public security. 
It is necessary to closely integrate crackdowns and 
special-purpose struggles with regulatory work. Serious 
criminals and economic criminals, no matter who they are, must 
be severely and speedily punished according to law, so as to 
protect state security as well as the property and lives of the 
people. 
  To consistently adhere to the principle of "grasping two 
links simultaneously" and to further stabilize the situation, it 
is necessary to strengthen the building of contingents of 
personnel. Public security departments, state security 
departments, judicial organs, and units of the armed police 
shoulder the important historical mission of ensuring political 
and social stability in the country. Therefore, governments at 
all levels should attach a high degree of importance to them. 
The masses of police officers should acquire a better 
understanding of the situation and be aware of their 
responsibility. It is necessary to set strict standards of 
conduct for the police, effectively strengthen the building of a 
clean and honest government, improve discipline and work style, 
and strive to build a contingent of law-enforcing personnel who 
are loyal, reliable, and professionally proficient, and who 
strictly observe discipline and enforce laws impartially. We 
should give full play to their functions and role in maintaining 
stability, protecting the people, attacking the enemy, punishing 
criminals, and serving economic construction. Meanwhile, we 
should unswervingly carry out national defense education to 
enhance citizens' national defense awareness. We should 
conscientiously do a good job in militia reserve services and 
launch extensive activities to support the army and give 
preferential treatment to the families of armymen, and to 
support the government and cherish the people so as to 
consolidate army-government and army-civilian unity. 
  (3) We should strengthen organs of political power at 
the grass-roots level. Organs of political power at the 
grass-roots level serve as bridges and links to help the party 
and the government maintain ties with the masses. The strength 
of grass-roots organs has direct influence over the overall 
situation of reform, development, and stability. Generally 
speaking, grass-roots organs and cadres in farming and pastoral 
areas are good and able to stand up to all tests. Under very 
difficult circumstances, they have worked hard and made positive 
contributions to economic development and stability in farming 
and pastoral areas. However, the overall quality of some 
grass-roots organs is poor; some cadres are weak, unmotivated, 
and incapable of boldly leading the masses to fight against 
separatists; and there are not enough reserve cadres. 
Governments at all levels must resolutely and conscientiously 
resolve these problems. They must attach great importance to 
the construction of organs of political power at grass-roots 
level and regard it as an important mission. They must 
strengthen training of grass-roots cadres by offering training 
classes for township-level cadres who attend the classes on a 
rotation basis in different stages and groups; and enhance 
grass-roots cadres' political and ideological awareness, their 
leadership in economic affairs, and their levels of general 
education and scientific knowledge. We must seriously 
reorganize and consolidate a few grass-roots organs that are 
politically feeble and lax in organization. We must promote to 
leadership positions comrades who dare adopt a clear-cut stand 
against separatism and maintain national unity, and who are 
capable of leading and organizing. At the same time, we should 
select and cultivate leading cadres from among outstanding army 
veterans and young intellectuals who return to their hometowns. 
Leading organs at all levels must be geared to the needs at the 
grass-roots level, make efforts to help grass-roots units solve 
problems, take care of grass-roots cadres materially, cherish 
them politically, support their work, and give full play to 
their role. We must firmly crack down on people who harm and 
retaliate against grass-roots cadres. We must strengthen organs 
of political power at the grass-roots level in border counties 
and townships to enable them to carry out such important 
missions as consolidating border defense, fostering 
good-neighborly and friendly relations, making people in border 
areas prosperous, and maintaining stability. 
  (4) We should conscientiously do a good job in mass 
work. In the course of deepening reform, because of the 
readjustment of the pattern of interests and relations between 
different interests, changes in social contradictions and new 
features of contradictions among the people are bound to emerge. 
We must do a careful and thorough job in political, 
ideological, and other relevant work. Whenever we introduce new 
reform policies, especially reform measures that are closely 
related to the people's vital interests, we must explain and 
publicize them among the masses in a clear and effective way. 
We must persist in guiding public opinion in the right 
direction and give full play to the role of grass-roots 
mediation organs to dispel people's misgivings or 
misunderstandings and to gain the understanding, participation, 
and support of all social sectors. Continuously improving the 
people's material and cultural standards is the basic goal of 
economic development and the starting point of government work. 
We must firmly establish the mass viewpoint, go down to the 
grass roots, immerse ourselves among the masses, and make closer 
contacts with the masses. We must try every possible means to 
increase the incomes of peasants and herdsmen; increase workers' 
incomes by improving enterprises' economic efficiency; create 
more employment opportunities in urban and rural areas; pay 
attention to the "shopping basket" by increasing the supplies of 
commodities, vegetables, meat, and butter; and make efforts to 
improve the people's living standards. We must pay special 
attention to practical problems facing poor peasants and 
herdsmen, workers of enterprises in bad shape, retirees, 
disabled servicemen, and family members of revolutionary martyrs 
and servicemen. We must make proper arrangements for their 
production and convey the concern of the party and government to 
every household. Only by doing so can we gain greater public 
support for party and government policies and enlist the joint 
efforts of people in developing the favorable situation marked 
by stability and unity. 

    (5) We should do nationality and religious work well in 
the new period. We should carry out the principal tasks on 
nationalities in the 90's by fully implementing the party's 
policy on nationalities and religion, consolidating and 
developing socialist nationalities relations, upholding and 
improving the regional national autonomy system, and promoting 
prosperity in Tibet. In the course of socialist revolution and 
construction, people of all nationalities in the region, who 
breathe the same air and share the same destiny, have cemented a 
close relationship that sees all nationalities going through 
thick and thin together and depending on each other for 
existence. In the new historic period, it is necessary to 
uphold education on Marxist nationality outlook; to enhance the 
ideological awareness of the people of various nationalities on 
patriotism and socialism; to firmly foster the concept that all 
nationalities are inseparable from each other; and to constantly 
strengthen equality, mutual help, unity, and cooperation among 
all nationalities. We should fully implement "The Law on 
Regional National Autonomy"; gradually establish a package of 
laws and regulations and supervisory mechanisms based on Tibet's 
political, economic, and cultural characteristics; 
conscientiously improve work relating to nationality townships; 
and guarantee that the rights of the various minority 
nationalities in Tibet in managing their internal affairs and in 
jointly running the state affairs will be fully exercised. We 
will continue to stress and strengthen the study, use, and 
development of the Tibetan language; intensify training of 
minority nationality cadres to produce large numbers of 
socialist-minded minority nationality cadres who are prepared to 
safeguard the unity of the motherland and nationality 
solidarity, honest in performing their official duties, keen on 
revolutionary cause, and adaptable to the requirements of the 
modernization drive. While enjoying continued state support and 
aid from economically developed regions, we should carry forward 
the spirit of hard struggle and self-reliance to accelerate 
Tibet's economic development. 
  In fully implementing the party's policy on religion, we 
should protect, according to law, the right of the broad masses 
to profess or not to profess a religion; resolutely overcome the 
phenomenon of weakness in not boldly attending to and managing 
problems which emerge in the religious field and in letting 
things run their course without interference; conscientiously 
enforce "The Regulations on the Management of Places of 
Religious Activities," and "The Provisions on Managing Foreign 
Nationals' Religious Activities Within the Boundaries of the 
PRC," both promulgated by the State Council; and firmly manage 
temples and religious affairs according to law. It is necessary 
to ban and crack down on activities conducted in the name of 
religion to split the motherland, commit crimes, interfere in 
state administration, judicial affairs, education, marital 
affairs, and normal production in society. Religious activities 
should be strictly placed within the limits permitted by both 
constitution and law. While resolutely preventing separatists 
from using religion for infiltration, it is necessary to 
actively guide religion to adapt itself to a socialist society 
by using certain positive factors in religion to serve 
socialism; to justly and forcefully publicize atheism, 
scientific knowledge, and anti-superstition efforts among the 
broad masses; to firmly suppress and crack down on both 
sorceresses and sorcerers who conduct feudal, superstitious 
activities to swindle money and harm the people; to strengthen 
education on patriotism and law observance among the monks and 
the nuns; and to direct the enthusiasm of the masses -- with or 
without religious beliefs -- to reform, opening up, economic 
development, and efforts to revitalize Tibet. 
  With the search for the Panchen reincarnated boy entering 
its 
crucial stage, it is hoped that people from all sectors, 
particularly the religious community, will resolutely adhere to 
principles set by the central authorities, unify understanding, 
keep in step, take the overall situation and interest into 
consideration, and closely coordinate with each other to ensure 
a successful search. 
  (6) We should strengthen the legal system. 
During the course of establishing the socialist market economic 
structure, a major task of the government is to formulate a 
complete set of laws and regulations to govern the economic 
activities of the government, enterprises and individuals, 
strengthen supervision over economic activities, and standardize 
and put on a legal footing economic relations, and economic 
operation and management. While the reform of the economic 
structure is being deepened and our region is opening wider to 
the outside world, the departments concerned should promptly 
study and put forward relevant draft laws and regulations in 
consideration of Tibet's reality, and submit them to the 
people's congress standing committee for deliberation and 
adoption, so that our legislation will keep pace with reform and 
our reform measures will be sound and legally binding. At the 
same time, we should improve various administrative rules and 
regulations and attach equal importance to both legislation and 
law-enforcement. We must ensure that we have laws to follow, 
existing laws must be obeyed and enforced strictly, and whoever 
violates the law must be brought to justice. We must apply the 
law in governing and safeguarding economic and social order. A 
further step should be taken to improve the judicial 
administration, do a good job in publicizing the legal system 
and spreading legal knowledge, and enhance the citizens' 
awareness of the need to apply the law in governing economic and 
other activities, so as to ensure smooth progress in reform, 
opening up, and economic construction, as well as other 
undertakings. 
  (7) We should actively promote various social 
undertakings and step up the building of spiritual 
civilization. In literature and art, radio and television 
broadcasts, cinema, press, and publications, we should continue 
to adhere to the orientation of "serving the people and 
socialism," and the policy of "letting a hundred flowers blossom 
and a hundred schools of thought contend." We should work under 
the guidance of the theory on building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and the party's basic line. We should adhere to 
the correct orientation for literary and art creation, and 
provide correct guidance for public opinion. To accelerate 
reform and development and stabilize the situation is the main 
subject of our present political and economic life. With this 
main subject in mind, we should strive to sing the praises of 
advanced deeds and advanced persons on various fronts, the 
people's creative spirit, and the old Tibetan spirit of hard 
struggle and selfless dedication. We should strive to report 
the new achievements in socialist modernization and the new 
situation in this region, guide the people to foster a correct 
outlook on life and correct values, guide them to establish 
lofty ideals and firm faith, and encourage them to work hard for 
Tibet's socialist modernization. At the same time, we should 
advocate diversification of literature and art to satisfy the 
people's daily increasing demand for nourishment for the mind. 
We should take a further step to excavate and sort the fine 
cultural heritage of all nationalities, improve the management 
and protection of cultural relics, and inherit and improve on 
the fine national culture in a scientific way. We should 
improve the management of the cultural market, firmly ban 
reactionary and profane books and audio-video products, and help 
socialist culture thrive. 
  In the public health work, we should adhere to the principle 
of putting prevention first, strive to offer primary medical 
care in farming and pastoral areas, and do a good job in 
enacting, implementing, and overseeing the enforcement of health 
care laws and regulations. We should pay more attention to the 
work of Tibetan doctors, develop the production of Tibetan 
medicine, ensure good work ethics among doctors, and raise the 
level of medical care. We should continue the current family 
planning policy. In farming and pastoral areas, we should put 
emphasis on propaganda, education, volunteering, birth control, 
and technical service, and pay more attention to the floating 
population. We should integrate the promotion of prenatal and 
postnatal care with the efforts to shake off poverty and achieve 
prosperity. We should vigorously promote mass sports and 
extensively carry out various sports activities among minority 
nationalities, and improve the people's physique. We should pay 
attention to training outstanding athletes and constantly 
improve their sports skills. 
  (8) We should deepen the anticorruption 
struggle. The anticorruption struggle is a matter of great 
significance to the success of reform, opening up, and the 
destiny of the party and the state. Leaders at all levels must 
further enhance their awareness of the anticorruption struggle's 
importance, urgency, and protracted nature, and earnestly do a 
good job and make achievements in this field. At present, Tibet 
has scored preliminary results in the anticorruption struggle. 
However, progress in this aspect has not been even. Some 
problems have provoked strong reaction from the masses and the 
anticorruption tasks remain arduous. We must conscientiously 
deepen the anticorruption struggle in line with the CPC Central 
Committee's principles and policies, and the autonomous regional 
party committee's plans. The anticorruption struggle should 
begin with cadres at all levels; leading cadres at or above 
county levels in particular must be honest and self-disciplined, 
and serve as a good example to others. Cadres at or above 
county levels are required to conduct earnest 
self-investigations and self-correction by the end of May in 
accordance with the five new provisions. Problems discovered in 
self-investigations will be handled leniently. We will 
investigate those few cadres who do not conduct any 
self-investigations and self-correction, and whose acts are 
deeply resented by the people. After verifying their acts, we 
will handle them strictly. We must continue to investigate and 
prosecute major cases of embezzlement, bribery, and serious 
malfeasance. We must pay close attention to handling and 
prosecuting cases involving leading cadres that are proved by 
clear evidence as well as make public some cases that will 
generate a great impact on society. We must decisively deal 
with persons who interfere in handling and prosecuting 
corruption cases, as well as instances of such interference. We 
must continue to do a good job in redressing irregularities in 
various trades and put the stress on government, judicial, 
administrative, law enforcement, and economic administrative 
organs. We must organize our efforts in investigating the 
reoccurrence of unauthorized fees that have been canceled by the 
government. We must carry out relevant measures and make 
progress in this field. 
  In the anticorruption struggle, we must correctly recognize 
the limits of various policies and make a strict distinction 
between various issues in terms of their nature in order to 
severely punish wrongdoers and to help those who have made 
mistakes at the same time. We must correctly handle the 
relationship among the anticorruption struggle, deepening 
reform, and establishment of a socialist market economic 
structure; and combine the anticorruption policies and measures 
with the practical moves of deepening reform. By deepening 
reform, we can stop up the loopholes emerging from the 
transition from the old system to a new one. Moreover, we must 
pay attention to certain areas in which problems tend to occur 
easily, step up our work, and improve rules and regulations in 
order to ensure healthy economic development. 
  (9) It is necessary to improve the style of work 
and strengthen leadership. Leading cadres at all levels 
must improve their work style, working methods and leadership; 
enhance their revolutionary dedication and their sense of 
urgency with respect to current tasks; and concentrate their 
energies on accelerating reform, promoting development, and 
ensuring stability. Leading cadres should conscientiously 
improve their work style, conduct investigation and work at the 
forefront of reform and production, and solve problems and 
direct the work there. They should apply the working method of 
"from specifics to generality," draw experience, relevant to the 
characteristics of their own work, from selected units at 
various levels, and make efforts to foster a number of models in 
various fields to promote a healthy development of overall work. 
We should practice the system under which leading cadres at 
various levels are held responsible for the attainment of 
certain objectives during their tenure. We should strictly 
appraise leading cadres' job performance with respect to reform, 
opening up, and economic construction, and the stabilization of 
the situation. In work, leading cadres should dare to pioneer, 
dare to be the first to do something, dare to practice, and have 
the courage to blaze new trails. They should assume a 
scientific attitude and have a keen sense of discipline. It is 
necessary to unify understanding, consider the interests of the 
whole, and advocate the subordination of partial interests to 
the interest of the whole, and of immediate interests to 
long-term interests. All departments, particularly departments 
for overall economic balancing, should coordinate with each 
other and prevent different departments from practicing 
different policies. It is necessary to stress overall 
coordination among various reforms. We must carefully plan and 
meticulously organize the implementation of all reform policies, 
and carry out these policies seriously. During the course of 
implementation, we must monitor progress and have a 
comprehensive understanding of the situation. When a problem is 
discovered, it must be solved promptly through coordination so 
as to ensure the smooth proceeding of reform. 
  Fellow deputies, we will usher in the 30th anniversary of 
the 
founding of the autonomous region next year. The central 
authorities have always been concerned about Tibet and the 
people of all nationalities in Tibet. Three generations of the 
central collective leadership with Comrades Mao Zedong, Deng 
Xiaoping, and Jiang Zemin at the core respectively have made 
painstaking efforts for Tibet's economic development and social 
progress. Tibet has obtained tremendous assistance from 
fraternal provinces, municipalities, and autonomous regions, as 
well as from the people of all nationalities across the country. 
The splendid achievements made by Tibet are the results of the 
correct leadership and cordial attention of the Party Central 
Committee and State Council; the results of vigorous support and 
unselfish assistance provided by the people of all nationalities 
across the country; and the results of unity, hard work, and 
unremitting efforts of the people of all walks of life and all 
nationalities in Tibet. In order to celebrate the autonomous 
region's 30th founding anniversary and display the new 
appearance of Tibet, the autonomous region has requested the 
state to approve a number of construction projects for 
agriculture, animal husbandry, infrastructure, and social 
development. Now, the state is actively studying the request 
and making arrangements, and some provinces, municipalities, and 
autonomous regions are stepping preparations for assisting us in 
the construction. The construction of these projects will 
surely play a great role in accelerating our economic 
development and promoting our social progress. There is only a 
little over a year left between now and the celebration day. We 
have a short time and yet a heavy task. We must do all we can 
to prepare for the start of the construction, to ensure good 
quality construction, and to complete all the construction 
projects successfully. We call on the party organizations, 
governments, army and police units, and the people in Tibet to 
work with one mind and one heart, redouble their efforts and 
greet the autonomous region's 30th founding anniversary with 
action and outstanding achievements. 
  Fellow deputies, our task is very arduous and there are many 
difficulties ahead. So long as we unite closely around the 
Party Central Committee with Comrade Jiang Zemin at its core and 
hold aloft the great banner of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics; and so long as the whole region unites as one 
and works hard, we certainly can create a new situation of 
reform, development, and stability in Tibet, and rapidly push 
all undertakings in Tibet into a new period of development. 

